Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.017

Authority to assist customers in the acquisition of water conservation equipment—Limitations.

Any city or town engaged in the sale or distribution of water is hereby authorized, within limits established by the Constitution of the state of Washington, to assist the owners of structures in financing the acquisition and installation of fixtures, systems, and equipment, for compensation or otherwise, for the conservation or more efficient use of water in the structures under a water conservation plan adopted by the city or town if the cost per unit of water saved or conserved by the use of the fixtures, systems, and equipment is less than the cost per unit of water supplied by the next least costly new water source available to the city or town to meet future demand. Except where otherwise authorized, assistance shall be limited to:

(1) Providing an inspection of the structure, either directly or through one or more inspectors under contract, to determine and inform the owner of the estimated cost of purchasing and installing conservation fixtures, systems, and equipment for which financial assistance will be approved and the estimated life-cycle savings to the water system and the consumer that are likely to result from the installation of the fixtures, systems, or equipment;

(2) Providing a list of businesses that sell and install the fixtures, systems, and equipment within or in close proximity to the service area of the city or town, each of which businesses shall have requested to be included and shall have the ability to provide the products in a workmanlike manner and to utilize the fixtures, systems, and equipment in accordance with the prevailing national standards;

(3) Arranging to have approved conservation fixtures, systems, and equipment installed by a private contractor whose bid is acceptable to the owner of the structure and verifying the installation; and

(4) Arranging or providing financing for the purchase and installation of approved conservation fixtures, systems, and equipment. The fixtures, systems, and equipment shall be purchased or installed by a private business, the owner, or the utility.

Pay back shall be in the form of incremental additions to the utility bill, billed either together with [the] use charge or separately. Loans shall not exceed two hundred forty months in length.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 5 s 1; 1989 c 421 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Water conservation encouraged—1989 c 421: "The conservation and efficient use of water is found and declared to be a public purpose of highest priority. The legislature further finds and declares that all municipal corporations, public utility districts, water districts, and other political subdivisions of the state that are engaged in the sale or distribution of water should be granted the authority to develop and carry out programs that will conserve resources, reduce waste, and encourage more efficient use of water by consumers.

In order to establish the most effective statewide program for water conservation, the legislature hereby encourages any company, corporation, or association engaged in selling or furnishing utility services to assist their customers in the acquisition and installation of fixtures, systems, and equipment, for compensation or otherwise, for the conservation or more efficient use of water." [ 1989 c 421 s 1.]

Contingent effective date—1989 c 421: "This act shall take effect on the same date as the proposed amendment to Article VIII of the state Constitution, authorizing the use of public moneys or credit to promote conservation or more efficient use of water, is validly submitted and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 1989. If the proposed amendment is not so approved and ratified, this act shall be void in its entirety." [ 1989 c 421 s 6.] Senate Joint Resolution No. 8210 was approved and ratified by the voters at the November 7, 1989, general election.